New Jersey, session 222, A2386.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  There is established in the Department of State a program to provide matching grants funds of up to $25,000 each to local government units to hire storytellers with Revolutionary War historical expertise for the purpose of attracting tourists in celebration of the United States Semiquincentennial. b.    In establishing the matching grant program pursuant to this section, the department shall: (1)   develop guidelines and procedures for submission of matching grant applications and criteria for the applications evaluation; (2)   establish terms and conditions for awarding a matching grant pursuant to this section, and monitor a grant recipients compliance with the terms and conditions; and (3)   require the recipient of a matching grant to report to the department information relating to its use of the funds. c.     The Department of State shall award matching grants to a local government unit on a competitive basis based upon an applicants demonstration of certain criteria, which shall include, but not be limited to: (1)   submission of specific objectives in the hiring of one or more storytellers with Revolutionary War historical expertise for the United States Semiquincentennial; and (2)   evidence the local government unit is located within an area of historical significance concerning the Revolutionary War. d.    (1)  Within 90 days after the date of enactment, and notwithstanding the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) to the contrary, the Department of State shall adopt, immediately upon filing proper notice with the Office of Administrative Law, the rules and regulations prepared by the department necessary to establish and implement the grant program. (2)   The rules and regulations adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be in effect until the expiration of the grant program. 2.    There is appropriated $2,000,000 from the General Fund to the Department of State to implement the provisions of section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  The unexpended balance on December 31, 2026 shall lapse into the General Fund. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire upon the earlier of: (1) the exhaustion of funds appropriated pursuant to section 2 of this act; or (2) December 31, 2026.